Washington statutes.
RCW 41.06.110

Washington personnel resources board—Created—Term—Qualifications, conditions—Compensation, travel expenses—Officers, quorum, records.

(1) There is hereby created a Washington personnel resources board composed of three members appointed by the governor, subject to confirmation by the senate. The members of the personnel board serving June 30, 1993, shall be the members of the Washington personnel resources board, and they shall complete their terms as under the personnel board. Each odd-numbered year thereafter the governor shall appoint a member for a six-year term. Each member shall continue to hold office after the expiration of the member's term until a successor has been appointed. Persons so appointed shall have clearly demonstrated an interest and belief in the merit principle, shall not hold any other employment with the state, shall not have been an officer of a political party for a period of one year immediately prior to such appointment, and shall not be or become a candidate for partisan elective public office during the term to which they are appointed;

(2) Each member of the board shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.250. The members of the board may receive any number of daily payments for official meetings of the board actually attended. Members of the board shall also be reimbursed for travel expenses incurred in the discharge of their official duties in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(3) At its first meeting following the appointment of all of its members, and annually thereafter, the board shall elect a chair and vice chair from among its members to serve one year. The presence of at least two members of the board shall constitute a quorum to transact business. A written public record shall be kept by the board of all actions of the board. The director shall serve as secretary.

(4) The board may appoint and compensate hearing officers to hear and conduct appeals. Such compensation shall be paid on a contractual basis for each hearing, in accordance with the provisions of chapter 43.88 RCW and rules adopted pursuant thereto, as they relate to personal service contracts.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 405; 2002 c 354 s 210; 1993 c 281 s 25; 1984 c 287 s 69; 1982 c 10 s 8. Prior: 1981 c 338 s 20; 1981 c 311 s 16; 1977 c 6 s 2; prior: 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 43 s 1; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 86; 1961 c 1 s 11 (Initiative Measure No. 207, approved November 8, 1960).]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.

Short title—2002 c 354: See RCW 41.80.907.

Effective date—1993 c 281: See note following RCW 41.06.022.

Legislative findings—Severability—Effective date—1984 c 287: See notes following RCW 43.03.220.

Severability—1982 c 10: See note following RCW 6.13.080.

Effective date—Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34: See notes following RCW 2.08.115.

Adoption of rules for leave sharing program: RCW 41.04.670.

Institutional religious coordinators—Appointment—Qualifications: RCW 72.01.210.